Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.040

Information for usurping office—Requisites—Damages.

Whenever an information shall be filed against a person for usurping an office, by the prosecuting attorney, he or she shall also set forth therein the name of the person rightfully entitled to the office, with an averment of his or her right thereto; and when filed by any other person he or she shall show his or her interest in the matter, and he or she may claim the damages he or she has sustained.

[ 2011 c 336 s 238; Code 1881 s 705; 1877 p 143 s 709; 1854 p 216 s 471; RRS s 1037.]